Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.115.150

Osteopathic or allopathic medical student clinical rotations.

Any osteopathic or allopathic medical school receiving state funds or authorized by the *higher education coordinating board may not prohibit a hospital or physician from entering into an agreement to provide student clinical rotations to qualified osteopathic or allopathic medical students.

[ 2011 c 150 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The higher education coordinating board was abolished by 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 301, effective July 1, 2012. The office of student financial assistance replaced the higher education coordinating board for higher education financial aid responsibilities pursuant to 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 102, effective July 1, 2012.

Findings—2011 c 150: "The legislature finds that a severe shortage of primary health care providers exists in Washington, particularly in rural and underserved areas of the state. The legislature further finds that an over reliance on specialty health care at the expense of primary care results in a health care system that is less efficient. The legislature further finds that institutions of higher education must produce more primary care providers. The legislature further finds that the efficient use of clinical sites for rotations will expand the supply of primary care providers. The legislature further finds that expanding residency programs in community health centers will increase residents' exposure to primary care practice." [ 2011 c 150 s 1.]